Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 469.504 is amended to read:
469.504. (1) A proposed facility shall be found in compliance with the statewide planning goals
under ORS 469.503 (4) if:
(a) The facility  has received local land use approval under the acknowledged comprehensive
plan and land use regulations of the affected local government; or
(b) The Energy Facility Siting Council determines that:
(A) The facility complies with  applicable substantive criteria from the affected local
government’s acknowledged comprehensive plan and land  use regulations that are required by the
statewide planning goals and in effect on the date the  application is submitted, and with any Land
Conservation and Development Commission administrative rules and  goals and any land use statutes
that apply directly to the facility under ORS 197.646;
(B) For an energy facility or a related or supporting facility  that must be evaluated against the
applicable substantive criteria pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, that  the proposed facility
does not comply with one or  more of the applicable substantive criteria but does otherwise comply
with the  applicable statewide planning goals, or that an exception to any applicable statewide
planning goal is justified under subsection (2) of this section; or
(C) For a facility that the  council elects to evaluate against the statewide planning goals pur-
suant to subsection (5) of this section, that  the proposed facility complies with the applicable
statewide planning goals  or that an exception to any applicable statewide planning goal is justified
under subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The council may  find goal compliance for a facility that does not otherwise comply with
one or more statewide planning goals by  taking an exception to the applicable goal.
Notwithstanding the requirements of ORS 197.732, the statewide planning goal pertaining to  the
exception process or any rules of the Land Conservation and Development  Commission pertaining
to an exception process goal, the council may take an exception to a goal if the council finds:
[(a)] (A) The land subject to the exception  is physically developed to the extent that the land
is no longer available for uses allowed by the applicable goal;
[(b)] (B) The land subject to the exception is irrevocably committed as  described by the rules
of the Land Conservation and  Development Commission to uses not allowed by the applicable goal
because existing adjacent uses and other relevant factors make uses allowed by the  applicable goal
impracticable;  or
[(c)] (C) The following standards are met:
Enrolled House Bill 4076 (HB 4076-B) Page 1
[(A)] (i) Reasons justify why the state policy embodied in the applicable goal should not apply;
[(B)] (ii) The significant  environmental, economic, social and energy consequences anticipated
as a result of the proposed facility have been identified  and adverse impacts will be mitigated in
accordance with rules of the council applicable to the siting of the proposed facility; and
[(C)] (iii) The proposed facility is compatible with other adjacent uses  or will be made compat-
ible through measures designed to reduce adverse impacts.
(b)(A) The council shall find that the standards under paragraph (a)(C)(i) of  this sub-
section are met if the council finds that the proposed energy facility:
(i) Will deliver electricity  to the electric grid utilizing an existing energy facility’s surplus
interconnection; and
(ii) Does not require associated transmission lines more than two  miles from the site
boundaries of the existing energy facility.
(B) As used in subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph, “surplus interconnection” means any
capacity at the point of interconnection under an existing energy  facility’s interconnection
agreement that  is not being utilized and does not exceed the original interconnection capac-
ity of the existing energy facility.
(3) If compliance with applicable substantive local criteria and applicable  statutes and state
administrative rules would result in conflicting  conditions in the site certificate or amended site
certificate, the council shall resolve the conflict consistent with the public interest. A resolution
may not result in a waiver of any applicable state statute.
(4) An applicant  for a site certificate shall elect whether to demonstrate compliance with the
statewide planning goals under subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section. The applicant shall  make the
election on or before the date specified by the council by rule.
(5) Upon request by the State Department of Energy, the special advisory group established
under ORS  469.480 shall recommend to the council, within the time stated in the request, the ap-
plicable substantive criteria under subsection (1)(b)(A) of this section.  If the special advisory group
does not recommend applicable substantive criteria  within the time established in the department’s
request, the council may either determine and apply the  applicable substantive criteria under sub-
section (1)(b) of this section or determine compliance with the statewide planning goals  under sub-
section (1)(b)(B) or  (C) of this section. If the special advisory group recommends applicable
substantive criteria  for an energy facility described in ORS 469.300 or a related or supporting fa-
cility that does not pass through  more than one local government jurisdiction or more than three
zones in  any one jurisdiction, the council shall apply the criteria recommended by the special advi-
sory group. If the  special advisory group recommends applicable substantive criteria for an energy
facility as defined in ORS 469.300 (12)(a)(C) to (E) or a related or supporting facility that passes
through more than one jurisdiction or more than three  zones in any one jurisdiction, the council
shall review the  recommended criteria and determine whether to evaluate the proposed facility
against the applicable substantive  criteria recommended by the special advisory group, against the
statewide planning goals or against  a combination of the applicable substantive criteria and state-
wide planning goals. In making its determination, the council shall consult with  the special advisory
group and shall consider:
(a) The number of jurisdictions and zones in question;
(b) The degree to which the applicable substantive  criteria reflect local government consider-
ation of energy facilities in the planning process; and
(c) The level of consistency of the applicable substantive criteria from  the various zones and
jurisdictions.
(6) The council is not subject to ORS  197.180 and a state agency may not require an applicant
for a site certificate to comply with any rules or programs adopted under ORS 197.180.
(7) On or before its  next periodic review, each affected local government shall amend its com-
prehensive plan and land use regulations as necessary to reflect the decision of  the council per-
taining to a site certificate or amended site certificate.
Enrolled House Bill 4076 (HB 4076-B) Page 2
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 34.020 or 197.825 or any  other provision of law, the affected local
government’s land use approval of a proposed  facility under subsection (1)(a) of this section and the
special advisory group’s recommendation of applicable substantive criteria under subsection  (5) of
this section shall be  subject to judicial review only as provided in ORS 469.403. If the applicant
elects to comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section, the provisions of this subsection shall  apply
only to proposed projects for which the land use approval of the local government  occurs after the
date a notice of intent or an application for  expedited processing is submitted to the State Depart-
ment of Energy.
(9) The State Department of Energy, in cooperation with other state  agencies, shall provide, to
the extent  possible, technical assistance and information about the siting process to local govern-
ments that request such assistance or that anticipate having  a facility proposed in their jurisdiction.
SECTION 2.  ORS 215.446 is amended to read:
215.446. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Average electric generating capacity” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469.300.
(b) “Energy generation area” has the meaning given that term in ORS 469.300.
(c) “Renewable energy facility” means:
(A) A solar photovoltaic power generation facility using:
(i) More than 100 acres but not more than 240 acres  located on high-value farmland as defined
in ORS 195.300;
(ii) More than 100 acres but not more than 2,560 acres located on land that is  predominantly
cultivated or that, if not cultivated, is predominantly composed of soils  that are in capability classes
I to IV, as specified by  the National Cooperative Soil Survey operated by the Natural Resources
Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture; or
(iii) More than 320 acres but not more than 3,840 acres located on any other land.
(B) An  electric power generating plant with an average electric generating capacity of at least
35 megawatts but less than 50 megawatts if the power is produced from geothermal  energy at a
single plant or within a single energy generation area.
(C) An  electric power generating plant with an average electric generating capacity of at least
35 megawatts but less than  100 megawatts if the power is produced from wind energy at a single
energy facility or within a single energy generation area.
(2) An application for a land use permit to establish a renewable  energy facility must be made
under ORS  215.416. An applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the county that the
renewable energy facility meets the standards under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) In order to issue a permit, the county shall require that the applicant:
(a)(A) Consult with the State Department of  Fish and Wildlife, prior to submitting a final ap-
plication  to  the county, regarding fish and wildlife habitat impacts and any mitigation plan that is
necessary;
(B) Conduct a habitat assessment of the proposed development site;
(C) Develop a  mitigation plan to address significant fish and wildlife habitat impacts consistent
with the administrative rules  adopted by the State Fish and Wildlife Commission for the purposes
of implementing ORS 496.012; and
(D) Follow administrative rules adopted by the State Fish and Wildlife  Commission and rules
adopted by  the Land Conservation and Development Commission to implement the Oregon Sage-
Grouse Action Plan and Executive Order 15-18.
(b) Demonstrate that the construction and operation of  the renewable energy facility, taking
into account mitigation, will not result in significant adverse impacts to  historic, cultural and
archaeological resources that are:
(A) Listed on the National Register  of Historic Places under the National Historic Preservation
Act (P.L. 89-665, 54 U.S.C. 300101 et seq.);
(B) Inventoried in a local comprehensive plan; or
(C) Evaluated as a significant  or important archaeological object or archaeological site, as those
terms are defined in ORS 358.905.
Enrolled House Bill 4076 (HB 4076-B) Page 3
(c) Demonstrate that the  site for a renewable energy facility, taking into account mitigation, can
be restored adequately to a useful, nonhazardous condition following permanent  cessation of con-
struction or operation of the facility  and that the applicant has a reasonable likelihood of obtaining
financial assurances in a form and amount satisfactory to the county to secure restoration of the
site to a useful, nonhazardous condition.
(d) Meet the general and specific standards for a renewable energy facility  adopted by the En-
ergy Facility Siting Council under ORS 469.470 (2) and 469.501 that the  county determines are ap-
plicable.
(e) Provide the financial  assurances described in paragraph (c) of this subsection in the form and
at the time specified by the county.
(f) For a renewable  energy facility that is a solar photovoltaic power generation facility using
the number of acres described in subsection (4) of this  section, provide a decommissioning plan to
accomplish  the  restoration of the site to a useful, nonhazardous condition as described in paragraph
(c) of this subsection. A decommissioning  plan provided under this paragraph must include bonding
or other security as the financial assurances described in paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(g) For a  renewable energy facility that is an electric power generating plant with an average
electric generating capacity of at least 50 megawatts but less than 100 megawatts that produces  the
power from wind energy at a single energy facility or within a single energy  generation area, pro-
vide a decommissioning  plan to accomplish the restoration of the site to a useful, nonhazardous
condition as described in  paragraph (c) of this subsection. A decommissioning plan provided under
this paragraph must include bonding or other security as the financial assurances described in par-
agraph (c) of this subsection.
(4) The requirements in subsection (3)(f) of this section  apply to a solar photovoltaic power
generation facility using:
(a) More than 160 acres but not more than 240 acres located on high-value farmland as  defined
in ORS 195.300;
(b) More than 1,280 acres but not more than 2,560 acres  located on land that is predominantly
cultivated or that, if not cultivated, is predominantly composed of soils  that are in capability classes
I to IV, as specified by  the National Cooperative Soil Survey operated by the Natural Resources
Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture; or
(c) More than 1,920 acres but not more than 3,840 acres located on any other land.
(5) Upon receipt of a reasonable cost estimate from  the state agency or tribe, the applicant and
county may jointly enter into a cost reimbursement agreement administered by the county with:
(a) The State Department of Fish  and Wildlife to receive comments under subsection (3)(a) of
this section.
(b) The State  Historic Preservation Officer or any affected federally recognized Indian tribe to
receive comments under subsection (3)(b) of this section.
(c) The State  Department of Energy to receive comments under subsection (3)(c) and (d) of this
section as well as comments regarding other matters as the county may require.
(6) A county that receives  an application for a permit under this section shall, upon receipt of
the application, provide notice  to persons listed in subsection (7) of this section. The notice must
include, at a minimum:
(a) A description of the proposed renewable energy facility;
(b) A description of the lots or parcels subject to the permit application;
(c) The dates, times and locations where public comments  or public testimony on the permit
application can be submitted; and
(d) The contact information for the governing body of the county and the applicant.
(7) The notice required under subsection (6) of this section must be delivered to:
(a) The State Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(b) The State Department of Energy;
(c) The State Historic Preservation Officer;
(d) The Oregon Department of Aviation;
Enrolled House Bill 4076 (HB 4076-B) Page 4
(e) The United States Department of Defense; and
(f) Federally recognized Indian tribes that may be affected by the application.
(8) If an exception is  required under rules of the Land Conservation and Development
Commission to allow the development of a renewable energy facility,  a local government may
justify a reason for an exception to a statewide land use planning goal relating to agricultural
lands under ORS 197.732 (2)(c)(A), if:
(a) The facility will deliver electricity to the electric grid  utilizing the capacity of an ex-
isting energy facility’s  point of interconnection that is under the existing energy facility’s
interconnection agreement and is not being utilized and  the electricity to be delivered does
not exceed the original interconnection capacity of the existing energy facility;
(b) The facility does not require associated transmission lines more than  two miles from
the site boundaries of the existing energy facility; and
(c) The county adopts findings addressing:
(A) The availability of nonresource lands suitable for the proposed use;
(B) The availability and use of existing infrastructure, access and rights of way;
(C) Public health and safety;
(D) Compatibility with surrounding agricultural and rural uses;
(E) A mitigation plan to address potential impacts to surrounding land  uses, farm prac-
tices and water resulting from the construction or operation of the facility; and
(F) Compliance with local, state or federal requirements.
SECTION 3.
This 2026 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 20, 2026
Repassed by House March 4, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4076 (HB 4076-B) Page 5